Utah statutes.
70A-9a-624.   Waiver.

(1)  A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under Section 70A-9a-611 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

(2)  A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under Subsection 70A-9a-620(5) only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

(3)  Except in a consumer-goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under Section 70A-9a-623 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

